Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.190

Retaliation against employee prohibited.

No farm labor contractor or agricultural employer may discharge or in any other manner discriminate against any employee because:

(1) The employee has made a claim against the farm labor contractor or agricultural employer for compensation for the employee's personal services.

(2) The employee has caused to be instituted any proceedings under or related to RCW 19.30.180.

(3) The employee has testified or is about to testify in any such proceedings.

(4) The employee has discussed or consulted with anyone concerning the employee's rights under this chapter.

[ 1985 c 280 s 13.]